Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB459.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 335B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Each licensing authority listed in subsection (4) of this section shall collect the following data using a data
collection application, during the annual, biennial, or triennial licensure renewal process:
(a) Licensee's personal information, including but not limited to:
1. The licensee's first, middle, and last name;
2. Date of birth;
3. Mailing address, email address, and phone number;
4. Physical address of all practice locations;
5. License type;
6. License number and date of issuance;
7. License expiration; and
8. National Provider Identifier number; and
(b) Workforce participation information, including but not limited to:
1. Degree level or certificates completed;
2. Employment type;
3. Employment specialty;
4. Employment setting;
5. Employment status, including but not limited to:
a. Actively employed in respective field;
b. Actively employed in a clinical setting, either in person or through telehealth, or both;
c. Actively employed outside of respective field;
d. Unemployed but seeking work in respective field; or
e. Unemployed but not seeking work in respective field;
6. Reason for unemployment, if applicable; and
7. Ability to meet patient needs of those covered under the federal Americans with Disabilities
Act.
(2) Data collected pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall not include a licensee's Social Security
number.
(3) Licensees may notify the licensing authority if the licensee wishes to decline the use of data collected under
subsection (1)(a) of this section to be made available to other employers or agencies for free or for
purchase.
(4) The following licensing authorities are subject to the requirements of this section:
(a) Professional licensure boards as defined in KRS 211.332;
(b) Kentucky Board for Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy established in KRS 311B.030;
(c) State Board of Podiatry established in KRS 311.410; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) Kentucky Department for Public Health, in regards to community health workers certified under
KRS 309.462.
(5) Each licensing authority listed in subsection (4) of this section shall report as necessary, and upon request,
the data collected under subsection (1) of this section to the Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics
established in KRS 151B.132 and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services for workforce capacity and
workforce reporting and tracking purposes.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 335.300 TO 335.399 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall grant licensure under KRS 335.320 and 335.330 to an applicant who:
(a) Holds an active license from another state to practice as an independent marriage and family
therapist;
(b) Is in good standing with the certifying or licensing board of that state;
(c) Is of good moral character;
(d) Has not had disciplinary actions of a serious nature brought against him or her by a registration,
certification, or licensing board or agency;
(e) Has met the examination requirement in KRS 335.330(3); and
(f) Has paid the application fee to the board.
(2) The applicant shall be exempt from:
(a) The education required in KRS 335.330(1); and
(b) The required hours of supervised experience in the practice of marriage and family therapy required
in KRS 335.330(2).
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 335.300 TO 335.399 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If the board identifies any technical error in any application submitted for issuance, renewal, or
reinstatement of a license or permit under KRS 335.300 to 335.399:
(a) The board shall notify the applicant of the error within one (1) week of its discovery;
(b) The applicant shall correct the error within two (2) weeks of notification of the error; and
(c) The board shall review the correction within one (1) week of receipt of the submitted correction.
(2) The board shall issue the license or permit within two (2) weeks of the date the application is complete.
Section 4. Each licensing authority required to collect data in accordance with Section 1 of this Act shall
have until the licensing authority's next licensure renewal date following the effective date of this Act to comply with
the collection requirement.
Section 5. Section 1 of this Act takes effect January 1, 2028.
Signed by Governor April 10, 2026.